Hawaii statutes.
[§88-1.2] Civil unions. For the
purposes of this chapter, the terms "married", "marriage", "marital",
"husband", "wife", or similar spousal terms shall include
civil union partners and civil unions under chapter 572B, unless recognition of
a civil union as a marriage conflicts with the requirements for the system to
be a tax-qualified plan under section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended. [L 2013, c 123, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next